Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-278
Game and Parks Commission; convey
property to county of Chase.

(1) The Game and Parks Commission
is authorized to convey to the county of Chase for public purposes the following
described real estate, now known as Champion Mill State Historical Park, situated
in the county of Chase, in the State of Nebraska, to-wit: All of block 4,
original town of Champion, Nebraska, and lots 1, 2, and 3, lot 4 except beginning
at the southwest corner of lot 4 in block 5 of the original town of Champion,
Nebraska, said point of beginning being at the point of intersection of the
north property line of Second Street and the east line of the alley in said
block 5; thence running north along the west line of said lot 4 a distance
of 70 feet; thence running east 75 feet parallel with the south line of said
lot 4; thence south parallel with the west line of lot 4 a distance of 70
feet to intersect the south line of said lot 4; thence west along the south
line of said lot 4 a distance of 75 feet to the place of beginning, the north
half of lot 9, and all of lots 10, 11, 12, and 13, all in block 5, original
town of Champion, Nebraska.

(2) The Game and Parks Commission is authorized to convey to the county
of Chase for public purposes the following described real estate, now known
as Champion Lake State Recreation Area, situated in the county of Chase, in
the State of Nebraska, to-wit:

(a) The following described portion of the southwest quarter of section
21, township 6 north, range 39 west of the 6th principal meridian in Chase
County, Nebraska, to-wit: Beginning at the northeast corner of said quarter
section; thence west on the north line of said quarter section 1,017 feet
to a stone; thence southeasterly 992 feet in a straight line to a point on
the west line of the west side of block 23, West Champion, which is 102.5
feet south of the northwest corner of said block 23; thence north 102.5 feet
to the northwest corner of said block 23, in West Champion; thence east along
the north side of said block 23 and along a line which is the north side of
said block 23 produced eastward to the east line of said quarter section;
thence north along the east line of said quarter section 644 feet to the northeast
corner of said quarter section; and

(b) The following described property, same being a part of the northwest
quarter of the southeast quarter of section 21, township 6 north, range 39
west of the 6th principal meridian in Chase County, Nebraska, to-wit: Beginning
at the northwest corner of the southeast quarter of section 21, township 6
north, range 39 west of the 6th principal meridian in Chase County, Nebraska,
and running thence east 1,080 feet; thence south 100 feet to the north line
of Fourth Street of the original town of Champion, Nebraska; thence west along
the said north line of Fourth Street aforesaid 1,080 feet; thence north 100
feet to the place of beginning, said land being also described as Lots 3,
4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, and 11, Champion subdivision of the northwest quarter
of the southeast quarter of section 21, township 6 north, range 39 west of
the 6th principal meridian in Chase County, Nebraska.

(3) Title to the property
described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall remain with Chase
County unless (a) Chase County ceases to operate the property as a public
park and recreation area or (b) a financial need arises pertaining to the
park that is detrimental to the county. In either case title to such property
shall revert to the Game and Parks Commission.

Laws 2012, LB739, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB16, § 1.